North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-02.1 State Fair Association [Repealed]

4-02.1-01.
State fair association. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-02.
Organization of state fair association — Initial members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-03.
Permanent members of state fair association. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-04.
Meetings — Time and place — Notice. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-05.
Compensation of members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 5; 2003, ch. 9, § 2; 2009, ch. 72, §
1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-06.
Board of directors — Meetings — Notice. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-07.
Annual meeting — Directors to call special meetings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-08.
Quorum to transact business. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-09.
Vacancies and special compensation of board members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 9; 2005, ch. 37, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-10.
Officers — Removal — Vacancies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-11.
Officers — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-12.
Director’s liability limited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 12; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-13.
Bylaws, rules, regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 13; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-14.
Appointment of necessary employees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-15.
State fair operating fund — Maintained in state treasury — Expenditures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 15; 1969, ch. 83, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-16.
Organization under corporation laws — Real property transactions — Contracts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-17.
Name in which business conducted and titles taken — Execution of written instruments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-18.
Certified audit of state fair association. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 18; 1979, ch. 21, § 3; 1989, ch. 73, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-19.
Attorney general to act as legal adviser. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 19; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-20.
Law enforcement — Arrangements with local law enforcement agencies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 20; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-21.
Service of process. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 21; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-22.
Exhibition date of fair to be filed. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 22; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-23.
Regulation and licensing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 23; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-24.
Unlawful acts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

4-02.1-25.
Nonliability of state for debts — Exception. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 25; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-26.
Annual report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 26; 1975, ch. 466, § 2; 1995, ch. 350, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02.1-27.
The Iverson grandstand. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 9, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.